Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1008
Warning signs.

Owners or operators of a trail developed pursuant to the Trail Development Assistance Act shall, at appropriate entry points, place signs warning that departures from the boundaries of the trail as marked by fences or otherwise may result in prosecution for trespass.

Laws 1991, LB 714, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-1508;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 383.
January 1, 2010